Maine, session 132, LD1191.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §8111 is enacted to read:
§8111. Child care services provided to family foster homes
1. Reimbursement for child care services. The department shall reimburse a child
care provider for child care services rendered to a family foster home within 15 days of
receiving a complete and accurate invoice for the child care services if the invoice meets
all the required state procurement and payment requirements. For purposes of this section,
"child care" has the same meaning as in section 3731, subsection 1.
2. Reimbursement procedures and administration. The department shall establish
procedures to ensure the timely processing and reimbursement of an invoice from a child
care provider under subsection 1. The department shall provide guidance to a child care
provider on the requirements for submitting a complete and accurate invoice under
subsection 1 and any necessary state procurement and payment requirements.
3. Report. On or before January 1st of every year, the department shall issue a report
to the Governor and the Legislature on the department's compliance with this section. The
report must include data on the average time taken for reimbursement, the number of
delayed reimbursements and any corrective action taken to address a delayed
reimbursement.